Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6048
Council; meetings; chairperson; secretary.

The council shall meet at least once during each calendar year and upon call of its chairperson or at the written request of a majority of its members. The council shall annually elect one of its members as chairperson and one of its members as secretary. The Director of Public Health or his or her designee shall represent the department at all meetings.

Laws 1967, c. 452, § 6, p. 1401;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-2036;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 194;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 646.